Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Article 4. Reciprocal Agreements.

Sec. 23.05.320.
Reciprocal agreements with other states.

The commissioner may enter into reciprocal agreements with the labor department or corresponding agency of another state, or with the person, board, officer, or commission authorized to act on behalf of that department or agency, for the collection in the other state of claims or judgments for wages based upon claims previously assigned to the commissioner.

History.

(§ 1 ch 114 SLA 1966)

Sec. 23.05.330.
Actions in courts of other states.

The commissioner may, to the extent permitted by a reciprocal agreement with an agency of another state, maintain actions in the courts of that state for the collection of claims or judgments for wages, and may assign claims or judgments to the labor department or agency of that state for collection.

History.

(§ 1 ch 114 SLA 1966)

Sec. 23.05.340.
Actions in this state for demands arising in other states.

The commissioner may, upon the written request of the labor department or corresponding agency of another state or of a person, board, officer, or commission authorized to act on behalf of that department or agency, maintain actions in the courts of this state upon assigned claims or judgments for wages arising in another state in the same manner and to the same extent that such actions by the commissioner are authorized for claims arising in this state; provided that these actions may be maintained only in the event that the department or agency in the other state provides, by agreement, reciprocal services to the commissioner.

History.

(§ 1 ch 114 SLA 1966)